Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4785.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.056, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Assignment of benefits. new text begin (a) new text end To be eligible for medical assistance a person must have applied or must agree to apply all proceeds received or receivable by the person or the person's legal representative from any third party liable for the costs of medical care. By accepting or receiving assistance, the person is deemed to have assigned the person's rights to medical support and third-party payments as required by title 19 of the Social Security Act. Persons must cooperate with the state in establishing paternity and obtaining third-party payments. By accepting medical assistance, a person assigns to the Department of Human Services all rights the person may have to medical support or payments for medical expenses from any other person or entity on their own or their dependent's behalf and agrees to cooperate with the state in establishing paternity and obtaining third-party payments. Any rights or amounts so assigned shall be applied against the cost of medical care paid for under this chapter. Any assignment takes effect upon the determination that the applicant is eligible for medical assistance and up to three months prior to the date of application if the applicant is determined eligible for and receives medical assistance benefits. The application must contain a statement explaining this assignment. new text begin (b)new text end For the purposes of this section, "the Department of Human Services or the state" includesnew text begin :new text end new text begin (1)new text end prepaid health plans under contract with the commissioner according to sections 256B.69 and 256L.12 and Minnesota Statutes 2009 Supplement, section 256D.03, subdivision 4, paragraph (c); new text begin (2)new text end children's mental health collaboratives under section 245.493; new text begin (3)new text end demonstration projects for persons with disabilities under section 256B.77; new text begin (4)new text end nursing facilities under the alternative payment demonstration project under section 256B.434; and new text begin (5)new text end the county-based purchasing entities under section 256B.692.